Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4110
Rules.

The Supreme Court, upon recommendation
by the Public Guardian, in consultation with the council, shall promulgate
rules to carry out the Public Guardianship Act.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 10.